Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
Chapter 9. Inventories of State Property

§ 29-9-1.
Inventories to be made by heads of state agencies.

The state auditor of public accounts shall require the heads of all state agencies to make an inventory of all lands, buildings, equipment, furniture, and other personal property owned by or under the control of the respective agencies, except highway rights of way owned or acquired by the Mississippi state highway commission. The inventories shall be made on forms to be prescribed and furnished by said state auditor. Agencies, including the legislature, which have on file proper inventories on August 8, 1968, shall not be required to make new inventories, but the remaining provisions of this chapter respecting inventories shall be applicable thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3853-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 29-9-3.
Content.

The inventories herein required shall show the name, description, serial number, purchase or construction date, and the cost or purchase price of each article or piece of property, and any further information which the state auditor may require. A number shall be securely attached to each piece of furniture, equipment, or other property designated by the auditor not having a serial number, and the number shall be used in inventories as a serial number. Estimates may be used for purchase prices and dates on items purchased prior to January, 1946, provided records of same are not available.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3853-02; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 29-9-5.
Execution and certification.

Each inventory shall be executed in duplicate, the copy shall be retained by the maker for his files, and the original shall be delivered to the state auditor of public accounts. The original shall be certified by the heads of the respective institutions, departments, commissions, and agencies, or a responsible bonded property officer designated by him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3853-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 29-9-7.
Master inventory compiled.

The auditor of public accounts shall compile or cause to be compiled from the inventories thus submitted to him one master inventory for the state as a whole, which shall be available for inspection to all state officials and newly elected or appointed officials who are about to take office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3853-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 29-9-9.
Disposal of obsolete or unnecessary property.

Whenever any vehicle, equipment, office furniture, office fixture or any other personal property which has been acquired or is owned by any institution, department or agency of the State of Mississippi becomes obsolete or is no longer needed or required for the use of such institution, department or agency, the same may be: (a) sold for cash, transferred, traded or exchanged for other property, furniture, equipment, fixture or vehicle needed by said institution, department or agency after having first obtained the written approval of the Governor’s Office of General Services and the State Auditor or approval by the Legislative Budget Office if utilized under the jurisdiction of the Legislature; or (b) donated to any institution, department or agency of the State of Mississippi, or any political subdivision or local governing authority of the state. The singular shall include the plural. Transfers, trades, exchanges or donations made pursuant to this subsection may be made to any political subdivision or local governing authority of the State of Mississippi.

The proceeds of all cash sales made, as authorized in this section, shall be paid over into the support and maintenance or contingent fund of the institution, department or agency as it deems best.

The head of each state institution, department or agency shall be responsible and liable personally and on his official bond, in the amount of the value shown on the state inventory, for the disposal of any property contrary to the provisions of this section.

The Office of General Services, on the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board, is hereby authorized and empowered to make reasonable rules and regulations and to require such information as may be necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this section.

Any violation of the provisions hereof by any elected head of any institution, department, commission or agency of the State of Mississippi, or any appointee or employee of any institution, department, agency or commission coming under the provisions of this section, shall constitute a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in addition to personal and official liability, as hereinabove provided.

The disposal of any unneeded personal property at the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi), may be made in accordance with the provisions of the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Act by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority, under such rules and regulations as may be adopted by such authority.

The disposal of any alternative housing units purchased through the Mississippi Alternative Housing Pilot Program may be made by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency as required by federal law to be in compliance with regulations of the federal articles of agreement and its awarded conditions, and upon approval of the Public Procurement Review Board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4065.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 361, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1955, Ex Sess ch. 25, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 188; Laws, 1996, ch. 554, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 593, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 441, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2008).

§ 29-9-11.
Report of additions and deletions.

On or before the fifteenth day of each month, the heads of all state agencies shall add to their inventory or inventories the items purchased or otherwise acquired during the last preceding month in the same manner as set forth in the original inventory, and indicate items that have been disposed of and that should be deleted therefrom, showing how and where disposals were made. Should there be no change in the inventory, a report shall be filed so indicating. This additional list and items to be deleted shall be submitted to the auditor of public accounts, to be used to add to or delete from the inventory or inventories in his office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3853-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 29-9-13.
Physical audit.

Representatives of the State Auditor’s office under the direction of the State Auditor, in making regular audits of the different state agencies, shall make a check or physical audit of the actual items or properties shown on their inventories and related records. Each state agency, the Secretary of the Senate, and the Clerk of the House of Representatives, when requested to do so, shall furnish a competent person or persons to assist in this check or physical audit. The auditor shall keep his records current at all times and shall report to the agency concerned and the general status of the inventory involved, on the completion of each audit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3853-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 189; Laws, 2012, ch. 567, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 520, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 29-9-15.
Rules and regulations.

The auditor of public accounts, on approval of the attorney general, is hereby authorized and empowered to make reasonable rules and regulations and to require such additional information as may be necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of the inventory requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3853-07; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 29-9-17.
Liability for failure to make inventory; recovery of value of missing items.

If any officer or employee of any state agency shall refuse or fail to make any inventory or supplemental inventory thereto as required herein, or to do so in the manner prescribed by the State Auditor, the State Auditor shall proceed to make, or cause to be made, the inventory or supplemental inventory; and the expense thereof shall be personally borne by said officer or employee, and he shall be responsible on his official bond for the payment of the expense.

In the event that an examination conducted pursuant to Section 29-9-13 finds items that are included on an agency’s inventory which are missing and otherwise unaccounted for, the State Auditor has the authority to proceed under the provisions of Section 7-7-211 to recover the value of the missing items. The demand shall be made against the head of the agency, the agency’s property officer and/or the appropriate officer or employee, if identified.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3853-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 8; Laws, 1986, ch. 488, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1986).

§ 29-9-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 23, effective upon passage, April 15, 2009.

§29-9-19. [Codes, 1942, § 3853-09; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1962.]

§ 29-9-21.
Complete and current records and reports.

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for more accurate, detailed, and readily available inventory information on all state property, said records to be maintained on machine equipment in the office of the auditor of public accounts. In carrying out the purpose hereof, it shall be the duty of the auditor to maintain his records complete and current and make such reports to the governor and the legislature whenever required, or when the said auditor, in his discretion, finds it necessary to make other and additional reports.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3853-10; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 11; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 190, eff from and after July 1, 1984.